Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-654
Brain injury registry; terms, defined.

For purposes of the Brain Injury Registry Act:

(1) Brain or head injury means clinically evident neurotrauma resulting directly or indirectly from closed or penetrating brain or head trauma, infection, febrile condition, anoxia, vascular lesions, toxin, or spinal cord injury, not primarily related to congenital or degenerative conditions, chemical dependency, or aging processes, which impairs mental, cognitive, behavioral, or physical functioning; and

(2) Department means the Department of Health and Human Services.

Laws 1992, LB 308, § 2;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 851;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 741;

Laws 2008, LB928, § 34.